Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2940
Mediation; uniform standards of practice; State Court Administrator; duties; mediation conducted in private.

(1) Mediation of cases under the Parenting Act shall be governed by uniform standards of practice adopted by the State Court Administrator. In adopting the standards of practice, the State Court Administrator shall consider standards developed by recognized associations of mediators and attorneys and other relevant standards governing mediation and other dispute resolution processes of proceedings for the determination of parenting plans or dissolution of marriage. The standards of practice shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Provision for the best interests of the child and the safeguarding of the rights of the child in regard to each parent, consistent with the act;

(b) Facilitation of the transition of the family by detailing factors to be considered in decisions concerning the child's future;

(c) The conducting of negotiations in such a way as to address the relationships between the parties, considering safety and the ability to freely negotiate and make decisions; and

(d) Provision for a specialized alternative dispute resolution process in cases where any of the conditions specified in subsection (1) of section 43-2939 exist.

(2) Mediation under the Parenting Act shall be conducted in private.

Laws 2007, LB554, § 21.